Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1615
Emergency, defined.

Emergency includes, but is not limited to, breaches and all conditions leading to or causing a breach, overtopping, or any other condition in a dam that may be construed as unsafe or threatening to life.

Laws 2005, LB 335, § 15.